Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 9.1 Pilots — Block Island Sound

46-9.1-1.
Legislative declaration.

The findings and declaration made by §

46-9-1

are hereby made applicable to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-2.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, and as used herein the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Block Island Sound” means the waters of the state west of a line drawn from the easterly point of Point Judith to the southeasterly point of Block Island and north of a line drawn from the southeasterly point of Block Island to the easterly point of Montauk Point, Long Island, New York.

“Block Island Sound pilot license” means a license issued to a person to pilot vessels in Block Island Sound by the state pilotage commission under the provisions of this chapter.

“Commission” means the state pilotage commission created under the provisions of chapter 9 of this title, as amended, entitled “Pilots.”

“Concurrent register” means that every foreign vessel and every American vessel engaged in foreign trade coming into and going out of waters common to the water boundaries of the State of Rhode Island and the water boundaries of any other state or states shall be regulated by the provisions of this chapter and the rules promulgated thereunder, and by the provisions of the statute or statutes of any other state or states having concurrent jurisdiction with Rhode Island over the vessels and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the other state or states statutes.

“Enrollment” means that every American vessel engaged in coastwise trade from one United States port to another United States port is enrolled with the United States Coast Guard, and every vessel is bound by the rules and regulations promulgated by the United States Coast Guard.

Register“ means that every foreign vessel and every American vessel engaged in foreign trade coming into and going out of Rhode Island Sound waters and Block Island Sound waters shall be regulated by the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder by the commission.

“Rhode Island Sound” means the waters of the state north of a line drawn from the easterly point of Point Judith to the southwesterly point of Sakonnet Point.

“Rhode Island Sound pilot license” means a license issued to a person to pilot vessels in Rhode Island Sound by the state pilotage commission under the provisions of chapter 9 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-3.
Pilotage commission — Control — Compensation.

The Rhode Island state pilotage commission created under the provisions of chapter 9 of this title, entitled “Pilots”, shall have control and jurisdiction over pilotage of vessels entering or departing from any port or landing place of the state or transversing the waters of Block Island Sound.

Members of the commission shall not be compensated for their services on the board, but shall be entitled to the reimbursement of their travel expenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 31.

46-9.1-4.
Powers and duties of commission.

The commission shall perform the duties set forth in this section and any other duties as may be provided by law:

Make, establish, and enforce rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, which shall be binding and effectual upon all pilots licensed by the commission, and upon all parties employing pilots; and, from time to time, revise or amend the rules and regulations as may be necessary to enable the commission to carry into effect the provisions of this chapter;

Make and establish rates of pilotage for such vessels as are subject to the provisions of this chapter;

Establish and determine the qualifications of any person applying for a pilot’s license, and conduct examinations;

Issue, suspend, or revoke any pilot’s license in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

Cause the laws, rules, and regulations concerning pilots and pilotage matters to be fully observed and executed;

Hear and decide complaints made in writing against any pilot for any misbehavior or neglect of or breach of rules or regulations, which it shall deem material to be investigated;

Hear and decide complaints made in writing by any pilot against any charterer, owner, agent, master, or sailor of a vessel for any misbehavior toward the pilot in the performance of his or her duty, or any breach of the rules and regulations;

Administer oaths and compel the attendance of witnesses at any hearings that it may conduct;

Make an annual report to the director of transportation for the preceding calendar year, together with the amounts of pilotage collected by the pilots and the amounts paid to the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-5.
Vessels required to take licensed state pilot.

Every foreign vessel and every American vessel under register entering or departing from any port or landing place of the state or transversing the waters of Block Island Sound shall take a pilot licensed under this chapter or under the laws of any other state having concurrent jurisdiction over these waters; and the vessels shall be subject to rules and regulations promulgated by the commission. In the case of a refusal to take a licensed pilot, the master, owner, agent, or consignee of the vessel shall pay the established pilotage fee as if a pilot had been employed.

Every vessel transporting petroleum products within the Block Island Sound waters of this state shall be required to have aboard a pilot who is licensed by this state, or any other state having concurrent jurisdiction over the waters, unless the vessel is a common carrier and its owner holds a certificate of convenience and necessity from the division of public utilities and carriers of this state or a like certificate from any other state having concurrent jurisdiction over the waters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-6.
Vessels not required to take pilots.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to vessels navigating under a certificate of enrollment or to fishing vessels. If any such vessel shall take on a pilot, the pilot shall be entitled to receive, as compensation for his or her services, pilotage fees in an amount not to exceed the rates established by the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-7.
Lien for pilotage fees.

Every licensed Block Island Sound pilot shall have a lien for his or her pilotage fees, for the period of sixty (60) days, upon the hull and appurtenances of any vessel liable to the pilot therefor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-8.
Accounting by pilots — Fraudulent return.

Once in every three (3) months every pilot shall render to the commission an accurate account of all vessels subject to the provisions of this chapter piloted by him or her, and of all moneys received by the pilot for pilotage of those vessels. Any pilot who shall fraudulently make a false return shall forfeit and pay to the State of Rhode Island the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each fraudulent return, and shall be liable for any other penalties which may be invoked by the commission under the provisions of §

46-9.1-18

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-9.
Liability for pilotage fees.

The master, owner, agent, or consignee entering or clearing a vessel at any port or landing place in this state or of a vessel transversing the waters of Block Island Sound shall be jointly and severally liable for pilotage fees at the rates prescribed by the rules and regulations of the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-10.
Use of unlicensed pilots — Penalties.

It shall be unlawful for the master, owner, agent, or consignee of any vessel, not exempt from the provisions of this chapter, entering or departing from any port or landing place of the state or transversing the waters of Block Island Sound, to take on any person not licensed as a Block Island Sound pilot under this chapter or any person not licensed as such a pilot under the laws of any state having concurrent jurisdiction over the waters to pilot a vessel in those waters.

It shall be unlawful for any person not licensed as a Block Island Sound pilot or any person not licensed as such a pilot by any state having concurrent jurisdiction over the waters of Block Island Sound, to pilot or offer to pilot a vessel, not exempt from the provisions of this chapter, entering or departing from any port or landing place of the state or transversing the waters of Block Island Sound. It shall likewise be unlawful for any master or person on board a tug or towboat to tow a vessel transversing the waters of Block Island Sound unless the vessel shall have on board a duly licensed state pilot.

Violation of the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment not to exceed one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-11.
Qualifications of licensee.

Every person who shall, after June 25, 1971 apply for a license to act as a pilot in the waters of this state, shall be a citizen or legal resident of the United States; shall possess a master’s license with a federal first class pilot’s endorsement covering the waters of Block Island Sound for which he or she makes an application; and shall conform to such physical and mental standards as the commission shall from time to time establish.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 164, § 9.

46-9.1-12.
Examination of applicants.

The commission shall conduct an examination for applicants for pilots’ licenses at a time and place that it shall, after due notice, direct. It shall examine the applicants with relation to their qualifications for the office of pilot. Each applicant shall be examined in particular concerning his or her knowledge of the tides, depths, bearings, and distances of the shoals, rocks, bars, and points of land and night lights in the navigation for which he or she applies for a license to act as pilot, and also touching any other matter relating thereto which the commission may deem proper. If, upon examination, the commission finds the person so applying to:

Possess the requisite physical and mental standards;

Be of good character and temperate habits; and

Have sufficient ability, knowledge, aptitude, and skill;

the commission shall grant him or her such class of license to act as a pilot as it shall deem advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-13.
Deferment of applications for future examination.

If the commission, after a public hearing duly called, deems that the number of licensed pilots is sufficient to meet the demands of commerce in the waters of this state, it shall place the names of the subsequent applicants on file for future examination and licensing in the order in which the applications are filed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-14.
Duration and renewal of licenses.

Any license issued under this chapter shall run concurrently with the applicant’s federal license issued by a duly constituted authority of the United States for the applicable waters of this state, and may be renewed upon renewal of the federal license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-15.
License fees.

Every application for a license to act as a pilot in the waters of this state shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) payable to the State of Rhode Island. Every pilot who shall request a renewal of his or her license shall pay to the State of Rhode Island a fee of five dollars ($5.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-16.
Bond.

No person shall receive a license or exercise the office of pilot until he or she has given to the general treasurer of the State of Rhode Island a bond with two (2) sureties to be approved by the commission, or a surety bond of a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, in the penal sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000), conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of his or her office and upon his or her obedience of the rules and regulations of the commission; provided, however, if any person has given a bond to the general treasurer under the provisions of chapter 9 of this title, he or she will not be required to give a second bond under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-17.
Repealed.

46-9.1-18.
Suspension or revocation of pilot’s licenses.

The commission may suspend any pilot for any period that it may deem proper, and may revoke and annul any pilot’s license which shall be issued under this chapter, upon satisfactory proof that:

The pilot has willfully disobeyed or violated the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation made and established by the commission; or

The pilot has negligently lost or damaged any vessel under the pilot’s care; or

The pilot is so addicted to the habits of intoxication as to be unfit to be entrusted with the charge of a vessel; or

The pilot is so mentally or physically incapable as to be unfit to carry on the duties of a pilot.

The commission may suspend any pilot’s license for a period of not to exceed three (3) months upon satisfactory proof that:

The pilot took charge of a vessel drawing more water than the pilot’s license authorized; or

The pilot has been guilty of any misconduct or neglect of duty detrimental to the business of piloting; or

The pilot neglects or refuses to appear, without justifiable cause, before the commission after having been duly notified to appear;

The pilot so suspended, at any time, upon due notice, may appeal to the commission for a rehearing of his or her case, and the commission shall have power to confirm or reverse its previous decision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-19.
Notice and hearing before revocation or suspension of license.

Before any person shall be proceeded against on any complaint, and before any pilot shall be removed or suspended, the person or pilot shall be notified in writing to appear before the commission. The notice shall specify the nature and substance of the complaint and shall be served personally, or be left at his or her last and usual place of abode, at least fifteen (15) days before the time fixed in the notice for his or her appearance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-20.
Reinstatement following suspension.

Any pilot whose license has been suspended shall, following the expiration of the period of his or her suspension, be entitled to the reinstatement of his or her license; provided, the pilot shall possess the same qualifications he or she had at the time the pilot received his or her first license as in this chapter provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-21.
Penalties.

Acting as pilot while under suspension. Any pilot whose license has been suspended or revoked who shall, during the period of his or her suspension or after the revocation of his or her license, act as a pilot, shall be subject to a fine of not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) and such disciplinary action as the commission shall deem advisable. Each violation shall be deemed a separate offense.

Surrender of license. A pilot whose license has been revoked or suspended shall surrender his or her license to the commission who shall retain it until the period of his or her suspension shall expire. Any suspended pilot who refuses to surrender his or her license on demand shall be subject to a fine of not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), and the commission may cause to be published in a newspaper published in the State of Rhode Island a notice that such person has no authority to act as a pilot unless and until reinstated according to law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-22.
Appeals.

Appeals from administrative orders or decisions made pursuant to any provisions of this chapter shall be to the sixth division district court pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42, the Administrative Procedures Law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 388, §§ 3, 16.

46-9.1-23.
Appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment thereof or so much thereof as may be necessary from time to time upon duly authenticated vouchers approved by the chairperson of the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.

46-9.1-24.
License without examination — Reciprocity.

A Block Island Sound license may be issued to an applicant who has been duly licensed or certified as a pilot under the laws of another state, territory, or foreign country when the requirements are substantially equivalent to or exceed the requirements of the examination offered by the commission and if the applicant otherwise meets the qualifications required by this chapter; provided, however, that the state, territory, or foreign country in which the person is licensed extends to licensed Block Island Sound pilots of this state a similar privilege.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 128, § 1.